South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4629.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 55, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-55-55.  (A) The Department of Environmental Services shall promulgate regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedures Act that require every public water system in the State to maintain a minimum disinfectant level of free or total chlorine in the water being delivered to the distribution system, in finished water storage tanks, and in all points of the distribution. The regulations may not specify a minimum disinfectant level of less than 0.1 parts per million. This section applies to any water system that provides water for residential consumption and use. However, the provisions of this section do not apply to any private water system that supplies water to three or less residences or that is used primarily for agricultural operations. (B) The department shall review regulations promulgated pursuant to this section as necessary and submit an annual report on the state of public water systems across South Carolina to the Senate Medical Affairs Committee and the House Medical, Military, Public and Municipal Affairs Committee no later than February first of each year. (C) An industrial user that owns, operates, and maintains a water system dedicated to the exclusive use of its operations or facilities may apply for a variance from any requirement to maintain a minimum disinfectant level of free or total chlorine in its water system. The department shall review any variance request and may grant approval if not inconsistent with applicable federal law. Nothing in this section may be construed to require an industrial user or consumer holding a variance or holding a variance pending a department determination to reapply for a variance. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----